Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 19 Auctioneers
62-19-119. Actions for the collection of compensation.

No person engaged in the business of or acting in the capacity of an auctioneer or an affiliate auctioneer shall bring or maintain any action in the courts of this state for the collection of compensation for any services performed as an auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer without first alleging and proving that the person was a duly licensed auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer at the time the alleged cause of action arose.

No affiliate auctioneer shall have the right to institute a suit in the affiliate auctioneer's own name for the recovery of a commission, fee or compensation for services as an affiliate auctioneer, but any such action shall be instituted and brought by the licensed auctioneer employing the affiliate auctioneer.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed so as to prevent a licensed affiliate auctioneer from suing the affiliate auctioneer's employing auctioneer for any compensation, fees or commissions due the affiliate auctioneer from the auctioneer.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 20; T.C.A., § 62-1920; Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 7.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “affiliate auctioneer” for “apprentice auctioneer” and “affiliate auctioneer’s” for “apprentice auctioneer’s” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Court costs and attorney's fees included in award, § 62-19-124.

62-19-120. Effect of revocation of auctioneer's license on affiliate auctioneers.

The license of an affiliate auctioneer shall be automatically suspended upon the revocation or suspension of the license of the auctioneer by whom the affiliate auctioneer is employed. The affiliate auctioneer may retain the affiliate auctioneer's license by transferring to the employment of another licensed auctioneer within twenty-one (21) days of the effective date of the revocation or suspension.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 21; T.C.A., § 62-1921; Acts 1983, ch. 250, § 18; 2019, ch. 471, § 7.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “affiliate auctioneer” for “apprentice auctioneer” and “affiliate auctioneer’s” for “apprentice auctioneer’s” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

62-19-121. Penalties.

A violation of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1967, ch. 335, § 22; 1976, ch. 824, § 10; 1978, ch. 569, § 8; T.C.A., § 62-1922; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Auctions and Auctioneers, § 2.

62-19-122. [Reserved.]

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11; T.C.A., § 62-1924.

62-19-124. Court costs and attorney's fees in collection actions.

Any judgment obtained by a licensed auctioneer as the result of an action in the courts of this state for the collection of the sales price for goods or real estate sold by a licensed auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer may include an award for court costs and reasonable attorney's fees.

Acts 1985, ch. 272, § 1; 2019, ch. 471, § 7.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “licensed auctioneer or affiliate auctioneer” for “licensed auctioneer or apprentice auctioneer”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

62-19-125. [Repealed.]

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 10; repealed by Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 19, effective July 1, 2019.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-19-125 concerned gallery licenses.

62-19-126. Citations for violations.

The administrative director and the investigator, acting on behalf of the commission, are authorized to issue citations against persons acting in the capacity of engaging in the auction business without a license in violation of this chapter.

Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe with specificity the basis of each citation.

Each citation shall contain an order to cease all violations of this chapter and an assessment of a civil penalty in an amount of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to specify those conditions necessary to the issuance of a citation and the range of penalties for violations of this chapter.

Service of a citation issued pursuant to this section may be made in person or by certified mail at the last known business address or residence address of the person cited.

A citation issued pursuant to this section shall be issued by the administrative director or investigator within one (1) year after the act or omission that is the basis for the citation.

Any person served with a citation pursuant to this section may appeal to the administrative director by written notice postmarked within fifteen (15) working days after service of the citation with respect to violations alleged, scope of the order or amount of civil penalty assessed.

If a person cited timely notifies the administrative director that the person intends to contest the citation, the administrative director shall afford an opportunity for a contested case hearing pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

After all administrative appeals have been exhausted, the administrative director may apply to the appropriate court for judgment in an amount of the civil penalty, plus applicable court costs, and for an order to cease activities in violation of this chapter. The motion for the order, which shall include a certified copy of the final order of the hearing officer or administrative judge, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of judgment and order.

The commission may waive any or all of a civil penalty by stating the reasons for the waiver in the official minutes of the commission.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that this section will not apply to any court sale.

62-19-127. Commission's power to petition for judicial jurisdiction.

In addition to the powers and duties otherwise conferred upon the commission in this chapter, the commission is empowered to petition directly any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction over any person in this state who is violating any of the provisions of this chapter, either with or without a license under this chapter, to enjoin the person from continuing the violation; and jurisdiction is conferred upon the chancery and circuit courts of this state to hear and determine such causes.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 13 provided for authorization of the commissioner to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section and that all such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1999, ch. 358, § 14 provided that this section will not apply to any court sale.

Cross-References. Authorization to issue citations, rules and regulations, 62-19-126.

Chancery courts, title 16, ch. 11.

Circuit and criminal courts, title 16, ch. 10.

62-19-128. Licensed public automobile auctions — Minimum requirements.

Public automobile auctions shall be licensed and regulated by the Tennessee auctioneer commission and the Tennessee motor vehicle commission when engaged in the sale of motor vehicles.

The following are minimum requirements for licensed public automobile auctions:

The public automobile auction shall have a letter of compliance with local ordinances from the local zoning authority;

The public automobile auction shall have garagekeeper's legal liability insurance in an amount not less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000);

The public automobile auction shall have a surety bond of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) issued by a licensed bonding company;

The public automobile auction shall have a compiled financial statement prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles by a certified public accountant or public accountant dated not earlier than twelve (12) months prior to the date of the application and shall furnish a copy of the financial statement to the commission along with any changes to the statement;

The public automobile auction shall have a minimum net worth of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

The public automobile auction shall have a business telephone in the auction company name. For purposes of this subdivision (b)(6), cellular telephones are not acceptable;

All signs shall be visible, and a permanent professional business sign shall be installed and have letters that are at least eight inches (8") tall;

The public automobile auction shall hold a current business tax license as required by local applicable law;

The public automobile auctioneer shall obtain and have displayed on its premises a valid motor vehicle dealer license from the Tennessee motor vehicle commission; and

The public automobile auction shall obtain and have displayed on its premises a valid license from the Tennessee auctioneer commission.

Prior to a motor vehicle being subject to a public automobile auction, the public automobile auctioneer shall verify that the motor vehicle has a clean and unencumbered title, by obtaining a valid motor vehicle title history from the department of revenue or if the motor vehicle is registered in a state other than this state, the appropriate titling agency in the other state.

All public automobile auctions must take place at the established place of business listed on the motor vehicle dealer license.

The public automobile auction shall not sell new or unused motor vehicles or vehicles with a manufacturer's statement of origin.

The public automobile auctioneer shall take possession of and retain title to each motor vehicle offered for sale at the auction. If the sale is finalized on a motor vehicle, the owner of the vehicle shall sign the title over to the public automobile auctioneer, who shall then sign the title over to and deliver the title to the buyer on the date of the sale. If a sale of the vehicle is not made, then the unsigned title shall be returned to the owner of the vehicle who offered the vehicle for sale at the auction. At all times, the public automobile auction shall be deemed the seller of the motor vehicle with the same duties and responsibilities as other licensed motor vehicle dealers.

The public automobile auction may hire a licensed auctioneer to solicit bids at an auction.

Acts 2008, ch. 724, § 4; 2019, ch. 471, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 724, § 8 provided that the Tennessee auctioneer commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All the rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 471, § 21. July 1, 2019.

62-19-123. Hearings and judicial review.